Idaho, session 2025, H0010.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 1, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-143, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-143. DISPLAY OF FLAGS AND BANNERS ON PUBLIC SCHOOL PROPERTY. (1) No
public elementary school or public secondary school in the state of Idaho
shall display any flag or banner on such school's property other than the
following flags and banners:
(a) The United States flag;
(b) The official flag of the state of Idaho, or any county, municipal-
ity, public university or community college, school district, special
district, or any other political subdivision or governmental instru-
mentality of or within the state;
(c) Official flags of any state in the United States;
(d) Official flags of recognized foreign nations;
(e) Official school flags;
(f) Official flags of any of the military branches and units of the
United States;
(g) Official flags of Indian tribes;
(h) Flags or banners recognized by the Idaho department of education
that are awarded for achievements; or
(i) Flags or banners representing official school mascots and colors.
(2) No flags or banners shall be displayed by a public elementary school
or public secondary school that represent a political viewpoint, including
but not limited to flags or banners regarding a political party, race, sexual
orientation, gender, or a political ideology.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.